Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1546
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-1546 to 44-1555 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation Act.

Laws 2026, LB967, § 16.
July 18, 2026